Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 232.46, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (6) Placement of the child in a supervised apartment living arrangement if the child has previously and continuously lived in a qualified residential treatment program, a shelter, or a combination of both, for a period of not less than six months immediately preceding the determination for placement in a supervised apartment living arrangement, and the child is lacking family support needed to successfully transition to independent living. Sec. 2. Section 234.35, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . 0e. When a court has entered an order transferring the legal custody of the child to a supervised apartment living arrangement pursuant to section 232.46, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (6). However, payment shall not be made for a supervised apartment living House File 298, p. 2 arrangement unless the supervised apartment living arrangement meets requirements as established by the department by rule. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 298, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor